North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 1. State Fair.

§ 106-502.
Land set apart.

For the purpose of the operating of a State fair, expositions and other projects which properly represent the agricultural, manufacturing, industrial and other interests of the State of North Carolina, there is hereby dedicated and set apart 200 acres of land owned by the State or any department thereof within five miles of the State Capitol, the particular acreage to be selected, set apart, and approved by the Governor and Council of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1927, c. 209, s. 1; 1959, c. 1186, s. 1.

§ 106-503.
Board of Agriculture to operate fair.

The State fair and other projects provided for in

G.S. 106-502

, shall be managed, operated and conducted by the Board of Agriculture established in

G.S. 106-502

. To that end, said Board of Agriculture shall, at its first meeting after the ratification of this section, take over said State fair, together with all the lands, buildings, machinery, etc., located thereon, now belonging to said State fair and shall operate said State fair and other projects with all the authority and power conferred upon the former board of directors, and it shall make such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary for the holding and conducting of said fair and other projects, and/or lease said fair properties so as to provide a State fair.

The Board of Agriculture may adopt regulations establishing fees or charges for admission to the State Fairgrounds and for services provided incidental to the use of the State Fairgrounds.

The Board of Agriculture, subject to the provisions of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes, may establish a schedule of rental rates for fair properties and specifications for the issuance of premiums so as to provide a State fair and other projects.

The Board of Agriculture shall provide and maintain recycling bins for the collection and recycling of newspaper, aluminum cans, glass containers, and recyclable plastic beverage containers at the State Fairgrounds.

History.

1931, c. 360, s. 3; 1959, c. 1186, s. 2; 1981, c. 495, s. 4; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1359, s. 2; 1987, c. 827, s. 34; 1991, c. 336, s. 2.

§ 106-503.1.
Board authorized to construct and finance facilities and improvements for fair.

Borrowing Money and Issuing Bonds. — For the purpose of building, enlarging and improving the facilities on the properties of the State fair, the State Board of Agriculture is hereby empowered and authorized to borrow a sum of money not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and to issue revenue bonds therefor, payable in series at such time or times and bearing such rate of interest as may be fixed by the Governor and Council of State: Provided, that no part of the payments of the principal or interest charges on said loan shall be made out of the general revenue of the State of North Carolina, and the credit of the State of North Carolina and the State Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services or the agricultural fund, other than the revenue of the State fair funds, shall not be pledged either directly or indirectly for the payment of said principal or interest charges. The receipts, funds, and any other State fair assets may be pledged as security for the payment of any bonds that may be issued.

Contracts and Leases; Pledge of Gate Receipts, etc. — For the further purpose of acquiring, constructing, operating and financing said properties and facilities on the North Carolina State fairgrounds, the Board of Agriculture may enter into such agreements, contracts and leases as may be necessary for the purpose of this section, and may pledge, appropriate, and pay such sums out of the gate receipts or other revenues coming to the State Board of Agriculture from the operation of any facilities of the State fair as may be required to secure, repay, or meet the principal and interest charges on the loan herein authorized. Prior to execution, the Board of Agriculture shall consult with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations on all agreements, contracts, and leases authorized under this subsection. The preceding sentence applies only to agreements, contracts, and leases with an estimated revenue to the State of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more.

Gifts and Endowments. — The State Board of Agriculture may receive gifts and endowments, whether real estate, moneys, goods or chattels, given or bestowed upon or conveyed to them for the benefit of the State fair, and the same shall be administered in accordance with the requirements of the donors.

History.

1945, c. 1009; 1959, c. 1186, s. 3; 1997-261, s. 109; 2001-487, s. 71.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, rather than the Board of Agriculture, has the authority to select the midway operator, execute contracts and operate and manage the North Carolina State Fair. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Eric Miller Reeves, The North Carolina General Assembly, and The Honorable Alice Graham Underhill, The North Carolina General Assembly, 2002 N.C. AG LEXIS 6 (1/24/02).

§ 106-503.2.
Regulation of firearms at State Fair.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized to prohibit the carrying of firearms in any manner on the State Fairgrounds during the period of time each year that the State Fair is conducted.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, any prohibition under this section shall not apply to the following persons:

Any person exempted by G.S. 14-269(b)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5).

Any person who has a concealed handgun permit that is valid under Article 54B of this Chapter [Chapter 14 of the General Statutes], or who is exempt from obtaining a permit pursuant to that Article, who has a handgun in a closed compartment or container within the person’s locked vehicle or in a locked container securely affixed to the person’s vehicle. A person may unlock the vehicle to enter or exit the vehicle provided the firearm remains in the closed compartment at all times and the vehicle is locked immediately following the entrance or exit.

History.

2015-195, s. 4(a).

§ 106-504.
Lands dedicated by State may be repossessed at will of General Assembly.

Any lands which may be dedicated and set apart under the provisions of this Article may be taken possession of and repossessed by the State of North Carolina, at the will of the General Assembly.

History.

1927, c. 209, s. 4(a).